Colorado statutes. TITLE 20 District Attorneys
ARTICLE 1
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS

Cross references:

For the election and term of district attorneys, see § 13 of article VI of the state constitution. For limitation on terms of elected government officials, see § 11 of article XVIII of the state constitution; for vacancies in the office of district attorney, see § 1-12-204; for prosecution by information, see part 2 of article 5 of title 16; for preliminary hearing, see part 3 of article 5 of title 16; for prosecution in county court, see article 2 of title 16.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 DEPUTIES, ASSISTANTS, AND EMPLOYEES

PART 3 COMPENSATION AND EXPENSES